South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4678.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  The General Assembly finds that: (1) South Carolina communities along the state border face unique challenges in recruiting law enforcement officers due to licensing and residency restrictions; (2) neighboring states such as North Carolina permit cross-border employment without residency limitations; and (3) allowing qualified officers from any state to work in South Carolina will enhance public safety, expand the talent pool, and provide flexibility to municipalities such as the Town of Fort Mill that face workforce shortages. SECTION 2.  Section 23-23-60(B)(5)(b) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (b) evidence satisfactory to the director that the candidate holds a valid current state driver's license issued by any jurisdiction of the United States with no record during the previous five years for suspension of driver's license as a result of driving under the influence of alcoholic beverages or dangerous drugs, driving while impaired (or the equivalent), reckless homicide, involuntary manslaughter, or leaving the scene of an accident. Candidates for certification as state or local correctional officers may hold a valid current driver's license issued by any jurisdiction of the United States; SECTION 3.  The South Carolina Criminal Justice Academy shall revise all certification standards, rules, and application procedures to remove any requirement that an officer holds a South Carolina driver's license or resides within the state as a condition of certification or employment. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----